North Carolina, session 2025, HB845.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 75A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 5.
"Water Safety Rescue Equipment at Public Docks and Piers.
"§ 75A-60. Title.
This Article shall be known as and may be cited as the State Waters Rescue Equipment Act.
"§ 75A-61. Definitions.
In addition to the definitions set forth in G.S. 75A-2, the following definitions apply to this
Article:
(1) Access point. – An area of shoreline of a waterbody that is intended to
facilitate direct public access to the water.
(2) Covered water access facility. – A pier or access point that is (i) open to the
public and (ii) owned or operated by the Commission, any other State agency,
or a unit of local government.
(3) High-incident drowning area. – An area within 100 feet of a pier or access
point where more than one fatal drowning incident has occurred in the span
of five years.
(4) Pier. – A man-made, raised structure extending into waters of this State for
use as a landing or mooring place for watercraft or as a promenade or to
protect or form a harbor.
(5) Public rescue equipment. – Includes a range of water rescue devices available
for public use in case of emergency, such as ring life buoys, throw bags, rescue
tubes, and rescue poles.
"§ 75A-62. Public rescue equipment on covered water access facilities.
(a) The owner or operator of a covered water access facility located in or adjacent to
waters of this State shall install public rescue equipment, including, at a minimum, ring life buoys
meeting the requirements of subsection (c) of this section, on each covered water access facility
located in waters of this State. The ring life buoy must not be permanently secured in any way to
the station, rack, or pier. Each ring life buoy must be stowed inside a station to protect it from
*H845-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
constant weather exposure. The station must be a bright orange or yellow color for high visibility
and to allow for quick access to the ring.
(b) The owner or operator of the covered water access facility shall be responsible for the
installation and maintenance of the public rescue equipment and shall also provide public
education regarding the public rescue equipment.
(c) Ring life buoys installed as required by this section must meet the following
requirements:
(1) The ring life buoy shall meet the requirements of 46 C.F.R. Part 160, Subpart
160.050 or 46 C.F.R. Part 160, Subpart 160.150 for SOLAS-approved
equipment or successor standards issued by the United States Coast Guard.
(2) A buoyant line of at least 100 feet in length with a breaking strength of at least
5 kilonewtons must be attached to each ring life buoy. The end of the line must
not be secured to the shore or the pier.
(3) Each ring life buoy must be marked with type II retroreflective material
meeting the requirements of 46 C.F.R. Part 160, Subpart 164.018.
(4) Each ring life buoy shall be placed at a distance not to exceed 200 feet from
the shoreline at each access point and be available for emergency rescue
operations.
(5) Each pier shall have a ring life buoy installed with appropriate signage alerting
the public to its availability and use."
SECTION 2. The sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Wildlife
Resources Commission to comply with the requirements of this act and to provide grants of no
more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) to units of local government located in economic tier
one areas of the State to comply with the requirements of this act.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 845-First Edition